Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-109
Game and Parks Commission; officers; oath.

Each commissioner and every conservation officer and each administrative officer under the Game and Parks Commission, before entering upon the duties of his or her office, shall subscribe and take the constitutional oath of office, which shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

Laws 1929, c. 113, § 13, p. 447;

C.S.1929, § 81-6513;

Laws 1935, c. 174, § 10, p. 644;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-6513;

R.S.1943, § 81-810;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-810;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 9.

For constitutional oath, see Article XV, section 1, Constitution of Nebraska.